zh-CN: 鼠标脚垫形状: DIY 圆点; 甜甜圈; 点; 全脚垫; 戒指; 条形; 通用圆点; 其他
zh-TW: 腳貼形狀: DIY點狀; 甜甜圈; 點; 全底座; 戒指; 直條; 通用點狀; 其他
pt-PT: Formato dos patins: Pontos DIY; Donut; Ponto; Pés completos; Anel; Faixa; Pontos universais; Outro
lt-LT: Pelės slidukų forma: DIY taškeliai; Spurga; Taškinis; Pilnos kojelės; Žiedas; Juosta; Universalūs taškeliai; Kita
it: Forma del pattino: Punti fai da te; Ciambella; Isometrico; Piedini completi; Anello; Nastro; Punti universali; Altro
fi: Luistimen muoto: DIY-pisteet; Donitsi; Piste; Täydet jalat; Rengas; Liuska; Yleispisteet; Muu
pl: Format skanera kodów kreskowych: Kropki DIY; Pączek; Kropka; Pełne stopki; Pierścień; Taśma; Uniwersalne kropki; Inne
bg-BG: Форма на кънката: DIY точки; Поничка; Точков; Пълни крачета; Пръстен; Strip; Универсални точки; Други
fr: Forme des patins: Points personnalisables; Donut; Dot; Pieds complets; Bague; Bande; Points universels; Autre
es: Forma de los patines: Puntos DIY; Dónut; Punto; Pies completos; Anillo; Banda; Puntos universales; Otros
sv: Skridskoform: GDS-punkter; Munk; Punkt; Hela fötter; Ring; Remsa; Universella punkter; Övrigt
tr: Ayak şekli: Kendin yap noktalar; Donut; Nokta; Tam ayaklar; Yüzük; Şerit; Evrensel noktalar; Diğer
el: Σχήμα πατινιών: Κουκκίδες DIY; Λουκουμάς; Dot; Πλήρη πέλματα; Δακτύλιος; Λωρίδα; Γενικές κουκκίδες; Άλλο
da: Skøjteform: Gør-det-selv prikker; Donut; Prik; Fulde fødder; Ring; Strip; Universelle prikker; Andet
ro-RO: Formă patină: Puncte personalizabile; Gogoașă; Punctată; Picioare complete; Inel; Bandă; Puncte universale; Altele
vi: Hình dạng miếng trượt: Chấm tự làm; Bánh vòng; Chấm; Chân đầy đủ; Nhẫn; Dải; Chấm đa năng; Khác
th: รูปร่างแผ่นรอง: จุด DIY; รสโดนัท; จุด; เต็มฐาน; แหวน; แถบ; จุดอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
nl: Vorm glijders: DIY-stippen; Donut; Punt; Volledige voetjes; Ring; Strip; Universele stippen; Andere
ru: Форма коньков: Самодельные точки; Пончик; Точка; Полные ножки; Кольцо; Полоса; Универсальные точки; Другой
hr-HR: Oblik klizača: DIY točke; Krafna; Točka; Cijele noge; Prsten; Traka; Univerzalne točke; Ostalo
hu: Talp alakja: Barkács pontok; Fánk; Dot; Teljes talpak; Gyűrű; Szalag; Univerzális pontok; Egyéb
en: Skate shape: DIY dots; Donut; Dot; Full feet; Ring; Strip; Universal dots; Other
de: Gleiterform: DIY-Punkte; Donut; Punkt; Vollständige Füße; Ring; Streifen; Universelle Punkte; Sonstiges
ja: スケートの形状: DIYドット; ドーナツ; ドット; フルフィート; リング; ストリップ; ユニバーサルドット; その他
pt-BR: Formato dos patins: Pontos faça você mesmo; Rosquinha; Dot; Pés completos; Anel; Faixa; Pontos universais; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika drsnikov: DIY pike; Krof; Pika; Polne nožice; Obroč; Trak; Univerzalne pike; Drugo
ko: 스케이트 모양: DIY 도트; 도넛; 점; 풀 피트; 반지; 조각; 유니버설 도트; 기타
sk-SK: Tvar korčúľ: DIY bodky; Šiška; Bodkovaný; Celé nožičky; Kruhový; Strip; Univerzálne bodky; Iné
nb: Glideflateform: Gjør-det-selv-prikker; Smultring; Dot; Hele føtter; Ring; Stripe; Universalprikker; Annet
cs: Tvar brusle: DIY body; Kobliha; Bodový; Celé nožičky; Prsten; Proužek; Univerzální body; Jiné